Ohio, session 136, HB941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 124.143 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 124.143. (A) An appointing authority shall review vacant positions every thirty days. The first review shall be completed not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section. If an appointing authority finds, during a review, that any permanent full-time position has been vacant for ninety days or more, the appointing authority shall eliminate the position. (B) If a position eliminated under division (A) of this section is included in the job classification plan established by the director of administrative services under section 124.14 of the Revised Code, on elimination of a position in accordance with division (A) of this section, the appointing authority shall notify the director of the elimination. On receipt of the notification, the director shall update the job classification plan as necessary.